Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-2001
Landmark heritage preservation district; commission; creation; purpose.

Any city of the metropolitan class may by ordinance provide for the creation and establishment of landmark heritage preservation districts and a landmark heritage preservation commission for the purpose of preserving buildings, lands, areas, or districts within any such city which are determined by the landmark heritage preservation commission to possess particular historical, architectural, cultural, or educational value.

Laws 1976, LB 711, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 322.
July 21, 2022